test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-vuen_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vueʹn: # Noun a-stem 'mother-in-law/anoppi' - full paradigm
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: vueʹn
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: vuânˈnam
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: vuânˈnam
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: vuânˈnma
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: vuânˈnmest
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Com+Indef: vuânmin
     vueʹn+N+Ess+Indef: vueʹnen
     vueʹn+N+Par+Indef: vueʹned
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [vuânˈnamtaa, vuânˈnamtää]
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: vuânˈnam
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: vuânˈnmi
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: vuânˈnmid
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: vuânˈnmid
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: vuânˈnmin
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Com+Indef: vuânˈnmivuiʹm
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [vuânˈnmitaa, vuânˈnmitää]
